Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 62
PCB WASTE DISPOSAL

Sec.

§ 39-6201. Short title. [Repealed.]

§ 39-6202. Legislative findings and purposes. [Repealed.]

§ 39-6203. Definitions. [Repealed.]

§ 39-6204. Legislative intent. [Repealed.]

§ 39-6205. Rules and regulations in general. [Repealed.]

§ 39-6206. General powers and duties of director. [Repealed.]

§ 39-6207. Unauthorized disposal of PCB waste prohibited. [Repealed.]

§ 39-6208. Records — Reporting

Monitoring. [Repealed.]

§ 39-6209. Investigation — Inspection

Right of entry. [Repealed.]

§ 39-6210. Enforcement procedures. [Repealed.]

§ 39-6211. Remedies. [Repealed.]

§ 39-6212. Violation — Penalty

Misdemeanor. [Repealed.]

§ 39-6213. Interstate cooperation. [Repealed.]

§ 39-6214. Employment security. [Repealed.]

§ 39-6215. Good samaritan protection. [Repealed.]

§ 39-6216. Severability. [Repealed.]